Illinois, session 104th, SB1566.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Intergovernmental Law Enforcement Officer's 5In-Service Training Act is amended by changing Section 4 as 6follows: 7    (50 ILCS 720/4)  (from Ch. 85, par. 564)8    Sec. 4. State Funding-Minimum Criteria. A Mobile Team 9In-Service Training Unit which meets the minimum criteria 10established in this Section is eligible to receive State funds 11to help defray the costs of operation. To be eligible a Mobile 12Team must:13    (1) Be established and operating pursuant to the 14Intergovernmental Cooperation Section Article VII, Section 10, 15of the Illinois Constitution of 1970 and must involve two or 16more units of local government including at least one county 17and the Board.18    (2) Establish an Advisory Board composed of elected local 19officials and chief law enforcement officers from 20participating units of local government and the Director, 21Chairman or appointed member of the Board to oversee the 22operations of the Mobile Team and make such reports to the 23Board as the Board may require.  SB1566- 2 -LRB104 04998 RTM 15026 b1    (3) Designate an elected local official to act as the 2financial officer of the Mobile Team for all participating 3units of government, and to receive and expend funds for the 4operation of the Mobile Team.5    (4) Limit its operations to in-service training of law 6enforcement personnel employed by the State, by units of local 7government or by the Federal government or their agencies and 8departments in the administration of justice or retired law 9enforcement officers qualified under federal law to carry a 10concealed weapon.11    (5) Cooperate with the Board in order to assure compliance 12with this Act and to enable the Board to fulfill its duties 13under this Act, and to supply the Board with such information 14as the Board deems necessary therefor.15    (6) Receive funding of up to 50% of the total approved 16budget of the Mobile Team from the participating units of 17local government.18    (7) Provide a part-time police training course at least 19every 12 months in a manner approved by the Board. 20(Source: P.A. 94-103, eff. 7-1-05.)